District of Columbia statutes.
2-1314

Repealed

Spanish Program Coordinators.

Repealed.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title III, § 304, 23 DCR 2543
June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-167, § 8(a), 51 DCR 4688
1981 Ed., § 1-2314.
1973 Ed., § 6-1914.